Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska81-2,285
False advertisement regarding food; prohibited; false advertisement, defined.

(1) It shall be unlawful for any person engaged in the sale, merchandising, or distribution of food to cause, with intent to deceive, the dissemination of a false advertisement regarding a food.

(2) An advertisement of a food shall be deemed to be false if it is false or misleading in any manner, including the following:

(a) The advertising of food as that of another;

(b) The advertising of food in a manner causing the likelihood of confusion or of misunderstanding as to the source, sponsorship, approval, or certification of such food;

(c) The advertising of food in a manner causing the likelihood of confusion or misunderstanding as to affiliation, connection, or association with or certification by another;

(d) The advertisement of food by use of deceptive representations or deceptive designation of geographic origin in connection with such food;

(e) The advertisement of food by way of representations that the food has sponsorship, approval, characteristics, ingredients, benefits, uses, or qualities that it does not have or that a person or company has a sponsorship, approval status, affiliation, or connection that he, she, or it does not have;

(f) The advertisement of food by way of a representation that the food is of a particular standard, quality, or grade when it is not;

(g) The advertisement of food by disparaging the food of another by false or misleading representations of fact;

(h) The advertisement of food with an intent not to sell it as advertised or an intent to sell an alternative food in substitution for the advertised food;

(i) The advertisement of food with the intent not to supply a reasonably expectable public demand unless the advertisement imposes a limitation of quantity; or

(j) The advertisement of food by making false or misleading statements of fact concerning the reasons for, existence of, or amounts of price reductions.

Laws 1981, LB 487, § 35;

Laws 1982, LB 547, § 16;

R.S.1943, (1987), § 81-216.31;

Laws 1991, LB 358, § 54.